test/src/dict-gt-yamls/V-luqggw_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Verb - luʼggõ: # Verb 29 'to read' stem: luʼggõ, TV_LUʼGGÕ - full paradigm
     luʼggõ+V+TV+Inf: luʼggõ
     luʼggõ+V+TV+Ger+Ine: luʼggõs
     luʼggõ+V+TV+Sup: luʼggõm
     luʼggõ+V+TV+Sup+Ine: luʼggõmõs
     luʼggõ+V+TV+Sup+Ela: luʼggõmõst
     luʼggõ+V+TV+Sup+Tra: luʼggõmõks
     luʼggõ+V+TV+Sup+Abe: luʼggõmõt

     luʼggõ+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: lugūb
     luʼggõ+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg2: lugūd
     luʼggõ+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg3: lugūb
     luʼggõ+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Pl1: luʼggõm
     luʼggõ+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Pl2: luʼggõt
     luʼggõ+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Pl3: luʼggõbõd

     luʼggõ+V+TV+Ind+ConNeg+Sg: luʼg
     luʼggõ+V+TV+Ind+ConNeg+Pl1: luʼggõm
     luʼggõ+V+TV+Ind+ConNeg+Pl2: luʼggõt
     luʼggõ+V+TV+Ind+ConNeg+Pl3: luʼggõt

     luʼggõ+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Sg1: lugīz
     luʼggõ+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Sg2: lugīzt
     luʼggõ+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Sg3: lugīz
     luʼggõ+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Pl1: lugīzmõ
     luʼggõ+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Pl2: lugīzt
     luʼggõ+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Pl3: lugīzt

     
     luʼggõ+V+TV+Imprt+Sg2: luʼg
     luʼggõ+V+TV+Imprt+Pl1: luʼggõgõm
     luʼggõ+V+TV+Imprt+Pl2: luʼggõgid
     luʼggõ+V+TV+Imprt+ConNeg: luʼg


     luʼggõ+V+TV+Cond+Sg1: luʼggõks
     luʼggõ+V+TV+Cond+Sg2: luʼggõkst
     luʼggõ+V+TV+Cond+Sg3: luʼggõks
     luʼggõ+V+TV+Cond+Pl1: luʼggõksmõ
     luʼggõ+V+TV+Cond+Pl2: luʼggõkstõ
     luʼggõ+V+TV+Cond+Pl3: luʼggõkstõ
     
     luʼggõ+V+TV+Jus+Sg: luʼggõg
     luʼggõ+V+TV+Jus+Pl: luʼggõgõd

     luʼggõ+V+TV+Quo+Sg: luʼggiji
     luʼggõ+V+TV+Quo+Pl: luʼggijid

     luʼggõ+V+TV+ActPrsPrc+Sg: luʼggõb
     luʼggõ+V+TV+ActPrsPrc+Pl: luʼggõbõd
     luʼggõ+V+TV+ActPrfPrc+Sg: luʼggõn
     luʼggõ+V+TV+ActPrfPrc+Pl: luʼggõnd

     luʼggõ+V+TV+PssPrsPrc+Sg: luʼgdõb
     luʼggõ+V+TV+PssPrsPrc+Pl: luʼgdõbõd
     luʼggõ+V+TV+PssPrfPrc+Sg: luʼgdõd

     luʼggõ+V+TV+Ger+Ine: luʼggõs
     luʼggõ+V+TV+Sup+Ill: luʼggõm
     
     
#
     vakțõ+V+TV+Ind+ConNeg+Sg: vakț
     kittõ+V+TV+Ind+ConNeg+Sg: kit
     riʼddõ+V+TV+Ind+ConNeg+Sg: riʼd
     kutsõ+V+TV+Ind+ConNeg+Sg: kuts
     laskõ+V+TV+Ind+ConNeg+Sg: lask
     akkõ+V+IV+Ind+ConNeg+Sg: ak

#luʼggõ+V+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Sg: lugdõd
     vakțõ+V+TV+PssPrfPrc+Sg: vakțõd
     kittõ+V+TV+PssPrfPrc+Sg: kittõd
     riʼddõ+V+TV+PssPrfPrc+Sg: riʼdtõd
     kutsõ+V+TV+PssPrfPrc+Sg: kutstõd
     laskõ+V+TV+PssPrfPrc+Sg: lastõd
     akkõ+V+TV+PssPrfPrc+Sg: aktõd
